Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.270

Declaration of policy respecting benefits for injury or death—Civil actions abolished.

The legislature of the state of Washington hereby declares that the relationship between members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system and their governmental employers is similar to that of workers to their employers and that the sure and certain relief granted by this chapter is desirable, and as beneficial to such law enforcement officers and firefighters as workers' compensation coverage is to persons covered by Title 51 RCW. The legislature further declares that removal of law enforcement officers and firefighters from workers' compensation coverage under Title 51 RCW necessitates the (1) continuance of sure and certain relief for personal injuries incurred in the course of employment or occupational disease, which the legislature finds to be accomplished by the provisions of this chapter and (2) protection for the governmental employer from actions at law; and to this end the legislature further declares that the benefits and remedies conferred by this chapter upon law enforcement officers and firefighters covered hereunder, shall be to the exclusion of any other remedy, proceeding, or compensation for personal injuries or sickness, caused by the governmental employer except as otherwise provided by this chapter; and to that end all civil actions and civil causes of actions by such law enforcement officers and firefighters against their governmental employers for personal injuries or sickness are hereby abolished, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

[ 1989 c 12 s 13; 1987 c 185 s 13; 1985 c 102 s 4; 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 14.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—1987 c 185: See notes following RCW 51.12.130.

Purpose—Retrospective application—1985 c 102: See notes following RCW 41.26.120.

Purpose—Severability—1971 ex.s. c 257: See notes following RCW 41.26.030.